Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-807
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Correctional Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Private Prison Contracting Act.

Laws 2001, LB 85, § 7.